Utah statutes.
31A-35-604.   Records.
(1) A bail bond producer shall maintain at the bail bond producer's place of
business:
(a)  records of all bail bonds the bail bond producer executes or
countersigns, so the public may obtain all necessary information concerning
those bail bonds for at least one year after the liability of the bail bond
surety has been terminated; and
(b)  any additional information the commissioner may reasonably require by
rule.
(2)  Records required to be maintained under Subsection (1) shall be available
for examination by the commissioner or the commissioner's representatives
during regular business hours.
(3)  The bail bond surety company shall maintain for three years after receipt
all records of any bail bond executed or countersigned by a bail bond producer
appointed by the bail bond surety company.
